Illinois, session 104th, HB2542.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 505 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/505)  (from Ch. 40, par. 505)7    Sec. 505. Child support; contempt; penalties. 8    (a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 9separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or 10dissolution of a civil union, a proceeding for child support 11following a legal separation or dissolution of the marriage or 12civil union by a court that lacked personal jurisdiction over 13the absent spouse, a proceeding for modification of a previous 14order for child support under Section 510 of this Act, or any 15proceeding authorized under Section 501 or 601 of this Act, 16the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of 17support to a child of the marriage or civil union to pay an 18amount reasonable and necessary for support. The duty of 19support owed to a child includes the obligation to provide for 20the reasonable and necessary physical, mental and emotional 21health needs of the child. For purposes of this Section, the 22term "child" shall include any child under age 18 and any child 23age 19 or younger who is still attending high school. For   HB2542- 2 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1purposes of this Section, the term "obligor" means the parent 2obligated to pay support to the other parent.3        (1) Child support guidelines. The Illinois Department 4    of Healthcare and Family Services shall adopt rules 5    establishing child support guidelines which include 6    worksheets to aid in the calculation of the child support 7    obligations and a schedule of basic child support 8    obligations that reflects the percentage of combined net 9    income that parents living in the same household in this 10    State ordinarily spend on their child. The child support 11    guidelines have the following purposes:12            (A) to establish as State policy an adequate 13        standard of support for a child, subject to the 14        ability of parents to pay;15            (B) to make child support obligations more 16        equitable by ensuring more consistent treatment of 17        parents in similar circumstances;18            (C) to improve the efficiency of the court process 19        by promoting settlements and giving courts and the 20        parties guidance in establishing levels of child 21        support;22            (D) to calculate child support based upon the 23        parents' combined net income estimated to have been 24        allocated for the support of the child if the parents 25        and child were living in an intact household;26            (E) to adjust child support based upon the needs   HB2542- 3 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        of the child; and2            (F) to allocate the amount of child support to be 3        paid by each parent based upon a parent's net income 4        and the child's physical care arrangements.5        (1.5) Computation of basic child support obligation. 6    The court shall compute the basic child support obligation 7    by taking the following steps:8            (A) determine each parent's monthly net income;9            (B) add the parents' monthly net incomes together 10        to determine the combined monthly net income of the 11        parents;12            (C) select the corresponding appropriate amount 13        from the schedule of basic child support obligations 14        based on the parties' combined monthly net income and 15        number of children of the parties; and16            (D) calculate each parent's percentage share of 17        the basic child support obligation.18        Although a monetary obligation is computed for each 19    parent as child support, the receiving parent's share is 20    not payable to the other parent and is presumed to be spent 21    directly on the child. 22        (2) Duty of support. The court shall determine child 23    support in each case by applying the child support 24    guidelines unless the court makes a finding that 25    application of the guidelines would be inappropriate, 26    after considering the best interests of the child and   HB2542- 4 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    evidence which shows relevant factors including, but not 2    limited to, one or more of the following:3            (A) the financial resources and needs of the 4        child;5            (B) the financial resources and needs of the 6        parents;7            (C) the standard of living the child would have 8        enjoyed had the marriage or civil union not been 9        dissolved; and10            (D) the physical and emotional condition of the 11        child and his or her educational needs.12        (3) Income.13            (A) As used in this Section, "gross income" means 14        the total of all income from all sources, except 15        "gross income" does not include (i) benefits received 16        by the parent from means-tested public assistance 17        programs, including, but not limited to, Temporary 18        Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security 19        Income, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 20        Program or (ii) benefits and income received by the 21        parent for other children in the household, including, 22        but not limited to, child support, survivor benefits, 23        and foster care payments. Social security disability 24        and retirement benefits paid for the benefit of the 25        subject child must be included in the disabled or 26        retired parent's gross income for purposes of   HB2542- 5 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        calculating the parent's child support obligation, but 2        the parent is entitled to a child support credit for 3        the amount of benefits paid to the other party for the 4        child. "Gross income" includes maintenance treated as 5        taxable income for federal income tax purposes to the 6        payee and received pursuant to a court order in the 7        pending proceedings or any other proceedings and shall 8        be included in the payee's gross income for purposes 9        of calculating the parent's child support obligation. 10            (B) As used in this Section, "net income" means 11        gross income minus either the standardized tax amount 12        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this 13        paragraph (3) or the individualized tax amount 14        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this 15        paragraph (3), and minus any adjustments pursuant to 16        subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (3). The 17        standardized tax amount shall be used unless the 18        requirements for an individualized tax amount set 19        forth in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3) are 20        met. "Net income" includes maintenance not includable 21        in the gross taxable income of the payee for federal 22        income tax purposes under a court order in the pending 23        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 24        included in the payee's net income for purposes of 25        calculating the parent's child support obligation.26            (C) As used in this Section, "standardized tax   HB2542- 6 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        amount" means the total of federal and state income 2        taxes for a single person claiming the standard tax 3        deduction, one personal exemption, and the applicable 4        number of dependency exemptions for the minor child or 5        children of the parties, and Social Security and 6        Medicare tax calculated at the Federal Insurance 7        Contributions Act rate.8                (I) Unless a court has determined otherwise or 9            the parties otherwise agree, the party with the 10            majority of parenting time shall be deemed 11            entitled to claim the dependency exemption for the 12            parties' minor child.13                (II) The Illinois Department of Healthcare and 14            Family Services shall promulgate a standardized 15            net income conversion table that computes net 16            income by deducting the standardized tax amount 17            from gross income.18            (D) As used in this Section, "individualized tax 19        amount" means the aggregate of the following taxes:20                (I) federal income tax (properly calculated 21            withholding or estimated payments);22                (II) State income tax (properly calculated 23            withholding or estimated payments); and24                (III) Social Security or self-employment tax, 25            if applicable (or, if none, mandatory retirement 26            contributions required by law or as a condition of   HB2542- 7 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            employment) and Medicare tax calculated at the 2            Federal Insurance Contributions Act rate.3            (E) In lieu of a standardized tax amount, a 4        determination of an individualized tax amount may be 5        made under items (I), (II), or (III) below. If an 6        individualized tax amount determination is made under 7        this subparagraph (E), all relevant tax attributes 8        (including filing status, allocation of dependency 9        exemptions, and whether a party is to claim the use of 10        the standard deduction or itemized deductions for 11        federal income tax purposes) shall be as the parties 12        agree or as the court determines. To determine a 13        party's reported income, the court may order the party 14        to complete an Internal Revenue Service Form 4506-T, 15        Request for Tax Transcript. 16                (I) Agreement. Irrespective of whether the 17            parties agree on any other issue before the court, 18            if they jointly stipulate for the record their 19            concurrence on a computation method for the 20            individualized tax amount that is different from 21            the method set forth under subparagraph (D), the 22            stipulated method shall be used by the court 23            unless the court rejects the proposed stipulated 24            method for good cause.25                (II) Summary hearing. If the court determines 26            child support in a summary hearing under Section   HB2542- 8 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            501 and an eligible party opts in to the 2            individualized tax amount method under this item 3            (II), the individualized tax amount shall be 4            determined by the court on the basis of 5            information contained in one or both parties' 6            Supreme Court approved Financial Affidavit (Family &7             Divorce Cases) and relevant supporting documents 8            under applicable court rules. No party, however, 9            is eligible to opt in unless the party, under 10            applicable court rules, has served the other party 11            with the required Supreme Court approved Financial 12            Affidavit (Family & Divorce Cases) and has 13            substantially produced supporting documents 14            required by the applicable court rules.15                (III) Evidentiary hearing. If the court 16            determines child support in an evidentiary 17            hearing, whether for purposes of a temporary order 18            or at the conclusion of a proceeding, item (II) of 19            this subparagraph (E) does not apply. In each such 20            case (unless item (I) governs), the individualized 21            tax amount shall be as determined by the court on 22            the basis of the record established. 23            (F) Adjustments to income.24                (I) Multi-family adjustment. If a parent is 25            also legally responsible for support of a child 26            not shared with the other parent and not subject   HB2542- 9 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            to the present proceeding, there shall be an 2            adjustment to net income as follows:3                    (i) Multi-family adjustment with court 4                order. The court shall deduct from the 5                parent's net income the amount of child 6                support actually paid by the parent pursuant 7                to a support order unless the court makes a 8                finding that it would cause economic hardship 9                to the child.10                    (ii) Multi-family adjustment without court 11                order. Upon the request or application of a 12                parent actually supporting a presumed, 13                acknowledged, or adjudicated child living in 14                or outside of that parent's household, there 15                shall be an adjustment to child support. The 16                court shall deduct from the parent's net 17                income the amount of financial support 18                actually paid by the parent for the child or 19                75% of the support the parent should pay under 20                the child support guidelines (before this 21                adjustment), whichever is less, unless the 22                court makes a finding that it would cause 23                economic hardship to the child. The adjustment 24                shall be calculated using that parent's income 25                alone.26                (II) Spousal Maintenance adjustment.   HB2542- 10 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            Obligations pursuant to a court order for spousal 2            maintenance in the pending proceeding actually 3            paid or payable to the same party to whom child 4            support is to be payable or actually paid to a 5            former spouse pursuant to a court order shall be 6            deducted from the parent's after-tax income, 7            unless the maintenance obligation is tax 8            deductible to the payor for federal income tax 9            purposes, in which case it shall be deducted from 10            the payor's gross income for purposes of 11            calculating the parent's child support obligation.12        (3.1) Business income. For purposes of calculating 13    child support, net business income from the operation of a 14    business means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary 15    expenses required to carry on the trade or business. As 16    used in this paragraph, "business" includes, but is not 17    limited to, sole proprietorships, closely held 18    corporations, partnerships, other flow-through business 19    entities, and self-employment. The court shall apply the 20    following:21            (A) The accelerated component of depreciation and 22        any business expenses determined either judicially or 23        administratively to be inappropriate or excessive 24        shall be excluded from the total of ordinary and 25        necessary business expenses to be deducted in the 26        determination of net business income from gross   HB2542- 11 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        business income.2            (B) Any item of reimbursement or in-kind payment 3        received by a parent from a business, including, but 4        not limited to, a company car, reimbursed meals, free 5        housing, or a housing allowance, shall be counted as 6        income if not otherwise included in the recipient's 7        gross income, if the item is significant in amount and 8        reduces personal expenses.9        (3.2a) Unemployment or underemployment. If a parent is 10    voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support 11    shall be calculated based on a determination of potential 12    income. In determining potential income, the court shall 13    consider the specific circumstances of a party, to the 14    extent known, including, but not limited to, the parent's:15            (1) assets;16            (2) ownership of a substantial non-income 17        producing asset;18            (3) residence;19            (4) employment and earning history;20            (5) job skills;21            (6) educational attainment;22            (7) literacy;23            (8) age;24            (9) health;25            (10) criminal records and other employment 26        barriers; and  HB2542- 12 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            (11) record of seeking work.2        The court shall also consider the local job market, 3    availability of local employers willing to hire the 4    parent, prevailing earning levels in the local community, 5    and other relevant background factors in the case. If 6    there is insufficient work history to determine employment 7    potential and probable earnings level, there shall be a 8    rebuttable presumption that the parent's potential income 9    is 75% of the most recent United States Department of 10    Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines for a 11    family of one person. Incarceration shall not be 12    considered voluntary unemployment for child support 13    purposes in establishing or modifying child support. 14        (3.2b) The court may impute income to a party only 15    upon conducting an evidentiary hearing or by agreement of 16    the parties. Imputation of income shall be accompanied by 17    specific written findings identifying the basis or bases 18    for imputation using these factors.19        (3.3) Rebuttable presumption in favor of guidelines. 20    There is a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or 21    administrative proceeding for child support that the 22    amount of the child support obligation that would result 23    from the application of the child support guidelines is 24    the correct amount of child support. 25        (3.3a) Minimum child support obligation. There is a 26    rebuttable presumption that a minimum child support   HB2542- 13 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    obligation of $40 per month, per child, will be entered 2    for an obligor who has actual or imputed gross income at or 3    less than 75% of the most recent United States Department 4    of Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines 5    for a family of one person, with a maximum total child 6    support obligation for that obligor of $120 per month to 7    be divided equally among all of the obligor's children.8        (3.3b) Zero dollar child support order. For parents 9    with no gross income, who receive only means-tested 10    assistance, or who cannot work due to a medically proven 11    disability, incarceration, or institutionalization, there 12    is a rebuttable presumption that the $40 per month minimum 13    support order is inapplicable and a zero dollar order 14    shall be entered. 15        (3.4) Deviation factors. In any action to establish or 16    modify child support, whether pursuant to a temporary or 17    final administrative or court order, the child support 18    guidelines shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for 19    the establishment or modification of the amount of child 20    support. The court may deviate from the child support 21    guidelines if the application would be inequitable, 22    unjust, or inappropriate. Any deviation from the 23    guidelines shall be accompanied by written findings by the 24    court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the 25    presumed amount under the child support guidelines without 26    a deviation. These reasons may include:  HB2542- 14 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1            (A) extraordinary medical expenditures necessary 2        to preserve the life or health of a party or a child of 3        either or both of the parties;4            (B) additional expenses incurred for a child 5        subject to the child support order who has special 6        medical, physical, or developmental needs; and7            (C) any other factor the court determines should 8        be applied upon a finding that the application of the 9        child support guidelines would be inappropriate, after 10        considering the best interest of the child. 11        (3.5) Income in excess of the schedule of basic child 12    support obligation. A court may use its discretion to 13    determine child support if the combined adjusted net 14    income of the parties exceeds the highest level of the 15    schedule of basic child support obligation, except that 16    the basic child support obligation shall not be less than 17    the highest level of combined net income set forth in the 18    schedule of basic child support obligation. 19        (3.6) Extracurricular activities and school expenses. 20    The court, in its discretion, in addition to the basic 21    child support obligation, may order either or both parents 22    owing a duty of support to the child to contribute to the 23    reasonable school and extracurricular activity expenses 24    incurred which are intended to enhance the educational, 25    athletic, social, or cultural development of the child.26        (3.7) Child care expenses. The court, in its   HB2542- 15 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    discretion, in addition to the basic child support 2    obligation, may order either or both parents owing a duty 3    of support to the child to contribute to the reasonable 4    child care expenses of the child. The child care expenses 5    shall be made payable directly to a party or directly to 6    the child care provider at the time of child care 7    services. 8            (A) "Child care expenses" means actual expenses 9        reasonably necessary to enable a parent or non-parent 10        custodian to be employed, to attend educational or 11        vocational training programs to improve employment 12        opportunities, or to search for employment. "Child 13        care expenses" also includes deposits for securing 14        placement in a child care program, the cost of before 15        and after school care, and camps when school is not in 16        session. A child's special needs shall be a 17        consideration in determining reasonable child care 18        expenses.19            (B) Child care expenses shall be prorated in 20        proportion to each parent's percentage share of 21        combined net income, and may be added to the basic 22        child support obligation if not paid directly by each 23        parent to the provider of child care services. The 24        obligor's and obligee's portion of actual child care 25        expenses shall appear in the support order. If 26        allowed, the value of the federal income tax credit   HB2542- 16 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        for child care shall be subtracted from the actual 2        cost to determine the net child care costs.3            (C) The amount of child care expenses shall be 4        adequate to obtain reasonable and necessary child 5        care. The actual child care expenses shall be used to 6        calculate the child care expenses, if available. When 7        actual child care expenses vary, the actual child care 8        expenses may be averaged over the most recent 12-month 9        period. When a parent is temporarily unemployed or 10        temporarily not attending educational or vocational 11        training programs, future child care expenses shall be 12        based upon prospective expenses to be incurred upon 13        return to employment or educational or vocational 14        training programs.15            (D) An order for child care expenses may be 16        modified upon a showing of a substantial change in 17        circumstances. The party incurring child care expenses 18        shall notify the other party within 14 days of any 19        change in the amount of child care expenses that would 20        affect the annualized child care amount as determined 21        in the support order. 22        (3.8) Shared physical care. If each parent exercises 23    3,504 hours or more 146 or more overnights per year with 24    the child, the basic child support obligation is 25    multiplied by 1.5 to calculate the shared care child 26    support obligation. The court shall determine each   HB2542- 17 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    parent's share of the shared care child support obligation 2    based on the parent's percentage share of combined net 3    income. The child support obligation is then computed for 4    each parent by multiplying that parent's portion of the 5    shared care support obligation by the percentage of time 6    the child spends with the other parent. The respective 7    child support obligations are then offset, with the parent 8    owing more child support paying the difference between the 9    child support amounts. The Illinois Department of 10    Healthcare and Family Services shall promulgate a 11    worksheet to calculate child support in cases in which the 12    parents have shared physical care and use the standardized 13    tax amount to determine net income.14        (3.9) Split physical care. When there is more than one 15    child and each parent has physical care of at least one but 16    not all of the children, the support is calculated by 17    using 2 child support worksheets to determine the support 18    each parent owes the other. The support shall be 19    calculated as follows:20            (A) compute the support the first parent would owe 21        to other parent as if the child in his or her care was 22        the only child of the parties; then23            (B) compute the support the other parent would owe 24        to the first parent as if the child in his or her care 25        were the only child of the parties; then26            (C) subtract the lesser support obligation from   HB2542- 18 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        the greater.2        The parent who owes the greater obligation shall be 3    ordered to pay the difference in support to the other 4    parent, unless the court determines, pursuant to other 5    provisions of this Section, that it should deviate from 6    the guidelines. 7        (4) Health care to be addressed by the court.8            (A) A portion of the basic child support 9        obligation is intended to cover basic ordinary 10        out-of-pocket medical expenses. The court, in its 11        discretion, in addition to the basic child support 12        obligation, shall also provide for the child's current 13        and future medical needs by ordering either or both 14        parents to initiate health insurance coverage for the 15        child through currently effective health insurance 16        policies held by the parent or parents, purchase one 17        or more or all health, dental, or vision insurance 18        policies for the child, or provide for the child's 19        current and future medical needs through some other 20        manner.21            (B) The court, in its discretion, may order either 22        or both parents to contribute to the reasonable health 23        care needs of the child not covered by insurance, 24        including, but not limited to, unreimbursed medical, 25        dental, orthodontic, or vision expenses and any 26        prescription medication for the child not covered   HB2542- 19 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        under the child's health insurance.2            (C) If neither parent has access to appropriate 3        private health insurance coverage, the court may 4        order:5                (I) one or both parents to provide health 6            insurance coverage at any time it becomes 7            available at a reasonable cost; or8                (II) the parent or non-parent custodian with 9            primary physical responsibility for the child to 10            apply for public health insurance coverage for the 11            child and require either or both parents to pay a 12            reasonable amount of the cost of health insurance 13            for the child.14            The order may also provide that any time private 15        health insurance coverage is available at a reasonable 16        cost to that party it will be provided instead of cash 17        medical support. As used in this Section, "cash 18        medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid 19        toward the cost of health insurance provided by a 20        public entity or by another person through employment 21        or otherwise or for other medical costs not covered by 22        insurance. 23            (D) The amount to be added to the basic child 24        support obligation shall be the actual amount of the 25        total health insurance premium that is attributable to 26        the child who is the subject of the order. If this   HB2542- 20 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        amount is not available or cannot be verified, the 2        total cost of the health insurance premium shall be 3        divided by the total number of persons covered by the 4        policy. The cost per person derived from this 5        calculation shall be multiplied by the number of 6        children who are the subject of the order and who are 7        covered under the health insurance policy. This amount 8        shall be added to the basic child support obligation 9        and shall be allocated between the parents in 10        proportion to their respective net incomes.11            (E) After the health insurance premium for the 12        child is added to the basic child support obligation 13        and allocated between the parents in proportion to 14        their respective incomes for child support purposes, 15        if the obligor is paying the premium, the amount 16        calculated for the obligee's share of the health 17        insurance premium for the child shall be deducted from 18        the obligor's share of the total child support 19        obligation. If the obligee is paying for private 20        health insurance for the child, the child support 21        obligation shall be increased by the obligor's share 22        of the premium payment. The obligor's and obligee's 23        portion of health insurance costs shall appear in the 24        support order.25            (F) Prior to allowing the health insurance 26        adjustment, the parent requesting the adjustment must   HB2542- 21 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        submit proof that the child has been enrolled in a 2        health insurance plan and must submit proof of the 3        cost of the premium. The court shall require the 4        parent receiving the adjustment to annually submit 5        proof of continued coverage of the child to the other 6        parent, or as designated by the court.7            (G) A reasonable cost for providing health 8        insurance coverage for the child may not exceed 5% of 9        the providing parent's gross income. Parents with a 10        net income below 133% of the most recent United States 11        Department of Health and Human Services Federal 12        Poverty Guidelines or whose child is covered by 13        Medicaid based on that parent's income may not be 14        ordered to contribute toward or provide private 15        coverage, unless private coverage is obtainable 16        without any financial contribution by that parent.17            (H) If dental or vision insurance is included as 18        part of the employer's medical plan, the coverage 19        shall be maintained for the child. If not included in 20        the employer's medical plan, adding the dental or 21        vision insurance for the child is at the discretion of 22        the court.23            (I) If a parent has been directed to provide 24        health insurance pursuant to this paragraph and that 25        parent's spouse or legally recognized partner provides 26        the insurance for the benefit of the child either   HB2542- 22 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1        directly or through employment, a credit on the child 2        support worksheet shall be given to that parent in the 3        same manner as if the premium were paid by that parent.4        (4.5) In a proceeding for child support following 5    dissolution of the marriage or civil union by a court that 6    lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, and 7    in which the court is requiring payment of support for the 8    period before the date an order for current support is 9    entered, there is a rebuttable presumption that the 10    obligor's net income for the prior period was the same as 11    his or her net income at the time the order for current 12    support is entered.13        (5) If the net income cannot be determined because of 14    default or any other reason, the court shall order support 15    in an amount considered reasonable in the particular case. 16    The final order in all cases shall state the support level 17    in dollar amounts. However, if the court finds that the 18    child support amount cannot be expressed exclusively as a 19    dollar amount because all or a portion of the obligor's 20    net income is uncertain as to source, time of payment, or 21    amount, the court may order a percentage amount of support 22    in addition to a specific dollar amount and enter such 23    other orders as may be necessary to determine and enforce, 24    on a timely basis, the applicable support ordered.25        (6) If (i) the obligor was properly served with a 26    request for discovery of financial information relating to   HB2542- 23 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    the obligor's ability to provide child support, (ii) the 2    obligor failed to comply with the request, despite having 3    been ordered to do so by the court, and (iii) the obligor 4    is not present at the hearing to determine support despite 5    having received proper notice, then any relevant financial 6    information concerning the obligor's ability to provide 7    child support that was obtained pursuant to subpoena and 8    proper notice shall be admitted into evidence without the 9    need to establish any further foundation for its 10    admission.11    (a-3) Life insurance to secure support. At the discretion 12of the court, a child support obligation pursuant to this 13Section and Sections 510, 513, and 513.5 of this Act may be 14secured, in whole or in part, by reasonably affordable life 15insurance on the life of one or both parents on such terms as 16the parties agree or as the court orders. The court may require 17such insurance remain in full force and effect until the 18termination of all obligations of support, subject to the 19following:20        (1) Existing life insurance. The court shall be 21    apprised through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to 22    the level, ownership, and type of existing life insurance 23    death benefit coverage available to one or both parents, 24    the cost of the premiums, cost ratings, and escalations 25    and assignment of the policy, if applicable, and all other 26    relevant circumstances. The court shall make findings   HB2542- 24 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    relative thereto.2        (2) New life insurance. The court shall be apprised 3    through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to the 4    availability of obtaining reasonably affordable new life 5    insurance. To the extent the court determines that the 6    support obligations should be secured, in whole or in 7    part, by new life insurance on the life of one or both 8    parents, the court may order that one or both parents 9    comply with all requirements to obtain such new life 10    insurance through employment, trade union, fraternal 11    organizations, associations, or individual means.12        In determining the level and type of death benefits 13    coverage to be obtained by a parent, the court shall 14    consider access and availability of life insurance to that 15    parent, the cost of the premium, cost ratings, and 16    escalations, if applicable, and all other relevant 17    circumstances.18        (3) Other security. If life insurance is unavailable 19    to a parent, the court, in its discretion, or as agreed to 20    by the parties, may order other equitable and reasonable 21    means to secure a child support obligation. 22    (a-5) In an action to enforce an order for child support 23based on the obligor's failure to make support payments as 24required by the order, notice of proceedings to hold the 25obligor in contempt for that failure may be served on the 26obligor by personal service or by regular mail addressed to   HB2542- 25 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1the last known address of the obligor. The last known address 2of the obligor may be determined from records of the clerk of 3the court, from the Federal Case Registry of Child Support 4Orders, or by any other reasonable means.5    (b) Failure of either parent to comply with an order to pay 6support shall be punishable as in other cases of contempt. In 7addition to other penalties provided by law the court may, 8after finding the parent guilty of contempt, order that the 9parent be:10        (1) placed on probation with such conditions of 11    probation as the court deems advisable;12        (2) sentenced to periodic imprisonment for a period 13    not to exceed 6 months; provided, however, that the court 14    may permit the parent to be released for periods of time 15    during the day or night to:16            (A) work; or17            (B) conduct a business or other self-employed 18        occupation.19    The court may further order any part or all of the earnings 20of a parent during a sentence of periodic imprisonment paid to 21the Clerk of the Circuit Court or to the parent having physical 22possession of the child or to the non-parent custodian having 23custody of the child of the sentenced parent for the support of 24the child until further order of the court.25    If a parent who is found guilty of contempt for failure to 26comply with an order to pay support is a person who conducts a   HB2542- 26 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1business or who is self-employed, the court in addition to 2other penalties provided by law may order that the parent do 3one or more of the following: (i) provide to the court monthly 4financial statements showing income and expenses from the 5business or the self-employment; (ii) seek employment and 6report periodically to the court with a diary, listing, or 7other memorandum of his or her employment search efforts; or 8(iii) report to the Department of Employment Security for job 9search services to find employment that will be subject to 10withholding for child support. 11    If there is a unity of interest and ownership sufficient 12to render no financial separation between an obligor and 13another person or persons or business entity, the court may 14pierce the ownership veil of the person, persons, or business 15entity to discover assets of the obligor held in the name of 16that person, those persons, or that business entity. The 17following circumstances are sufficient to authorize a court to 18order discovery of the assets of a person, persons, or 19business entity and to compel the application of any 20discovered assets toward payment on the judgment for support:21        (1) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 22    entity maintain records together.23        (2) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 24    entity fail to maintain an arm's length relationship 25    between themselves with regard to any assets.26        (3) the obligor transfers assets to the person,   HB2542- 27 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    persons, or business entity with the intent to perpetrate 2    a fraud on the obligee.3    With respect to assets which are real property, no order 4entered under this paragraph shall affect the rights of bona 5fide purchasers, mortgagees, judgment creditors, or other lien 6holders who acquire their interests in the property prior to 7the time a notice of lis pendens pursuant to the Code of Civil 8Procedure or a copy of the order is placed of record in the 9office of the recorder of deeds for the county in which the 10real property is located.11    The court may also order in cases where the parent is 90 12days or more delinquent in payment of support or has been 13adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days 14obligation or more, that the parent's Illinois driving 15privileges be suspended until the court determines that the 16parent is in compliance with the order of support. The court 17may also order that the parent be issued a family financial 18responsibility driving permit that would allow limited driving 19privileges for employment and medical purposes in accordance 20with Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The Clerk 21of the Circuit Court shall certify the order suspending the 22driving privileges of the parent or granting the issuance of a 23family financial responsibility driving permit to the 24Secretary of State on forms prescribed by the Secretary of 25State. Upon receipt of the authenticated documents, the 26Secretary of State shall suspend the parent's driving   HB2542- 28 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1privileges until further order of the court and shall, if 2ordered by the court, subject to the provisions of Section 37-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, issue a family financial 4responsibility driving permit to the parent.5    In addition to the penalties or punishment that may be 6imposed under this Section, any person whose conduct 7constitutes a violation of Section 15 of the Non-Support 8Punishment Act may be prosecuted under that Act, and a person 9convicted under that Act may be sentenced in accordance with 10that Act. The sentence may include but need not be limited to a 11requirement that the person perform community service under 12Section 50 of that Act or participate in a work alternative 13program under Section 50 of that Act. A person may not be 14required to participate in a work alternative program under 15Section 50 of that Act if the person is currently 16participating in a work program pursuant to Section 505.1 of 17this Act.18    A support obligation, or any portion of a support 19obligation, which becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end 20of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 21that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month, 22shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of 23the Code of Civil Procedure. An order for support entered or 24modified on or after January 1, 2006 shall contain a statement 25that a support obligation required under the order, or any 26portion of a support obligation required under the order, that   HB2542- 29 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end of each month, 2excluding the child support that was due for that month to the 3extent that it was not paid in that month, shall accrue simple 4interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of the Code of Civil 5Procedure. Failure to include the statement in the order for 6support does not affect the validity of the order or the 7accrual of interest as provided in this Section.8    (c) A one-time charge of 20% is imposable upon the amount 9of past-due child support owed on July 1, 1988 which has 10accrued under a support order entered by the court. The charge 11shall be imposed in accordance with the provisions of Section 1210-21 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and shall be enforced by 13the court upon petition.14    (d) Any new or existing support order entered by the court 15under this Section shall be deemed to be a series of judgments 16against the person obligated to pay support thereunder, each 17such judgment to be in the amount of each payment or 18installment of support and each such judgment to be deemed 19entered as of the date the corresponding payment or 20installment becomes due under the terms of the support order. 21Each such judgment shall have the full force, effect and 22attributes of any other judgment of this State, including the 23ability to be enforced. Notwithstanding any other State or 24local law to the contrary, a lien arises by operation of law 25against the real and personal property of the obligor for each 26installment of overdue support owed by the obligor.  HB2542- 30 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1    (e) When child support is to be paid through the Clerk of 2the Court in a county of 500,000 inhabitants or less, the order 3shall direct the obligor to pay to the Clerk, in addition to 4the child support payments, all fees imposed by the county 5board under paragraph (2) of subsection (j-5) of Section 27.1b 6of the Clerks of Courts Act. When child support is to be paid 7through the clerk of the court in a county of more than 500,000 8but less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the order shall direct 9the obligor to pay to the clerk, in addition to the child 10support payments, all fees imposed by the county board under 11paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.2 of the Clerks 12of Courts Act. Unless paid pursuant to an Income Withholding 13Order/Notice for Support, the payment of the fee shall be by 14payment acceptable to the clerk and shall be made to the order 15of the Clerk.16    (f) All orders for support, when entered or modified, 17shall include a provision requiring the obligor to notify the 18court and, in cases in which a party is receiving child and 19spouse services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 20Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 217 days, (i) of the name and address of any new employer of the 22obligor, (ii) whether the obligor has access to health 23insurance coverage through the employer or other group 24coverage and, if so, the policy name and number and the names 25of persons covered under the policy, except only the initials 26of any covered minors shall be included, and (iii) of any new   HB2542- 31 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1residential or mailing address or telephone number of the 2obligor. In any subsequent action to enforce a support order, 3upon a sufficient showing that a diligent effort has been made 4to ascertain the location of the obligor, service of process 5or provision of notice necessary in the case may be made at the 6last known address of the obligor in any manner expressly 7provided by the Code of Civil Procedure or this Act, which 8service shall be sufficient for purposes of due process.9    (g) An order for support shall include a date on which the 10current support obligation terminates. The termination date 11shall be no earlier than the date on which the child covered by 12the order will attain the age of 18. However, if the child will 13not graduate from high school until after attaining the age of 1418, then the termination date shall be no earlier than the 15earlier of the date on which the child's high school 16graduation will occur or the date on which the child will 17attain the age of 19. The order for support shall state that 18the termination date does not apply to any arrearage that may 19remain unpaid on that date. Nothing in this subsection shall 20be construed to prevent the court from modifying the order or 21terminating the order in the event the child is otherwise 22emancipated.23    (g-5) If there is an unpaid arrearage or delinquency (as 24those terms are defined in the Income Withholding for Support 25Act) equal to at least one month's support obligation on the 26termination date stated in the order for support or, if there   HB2542- 32 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1is no termination date stated in the order, on the date the 2child attains the age of majority or is otherwise emancipated, 3the periodic amount required to be paid for current support of 4that child immediately prior to that date shall automatically 5continue to be an obligation, not as current support but as 6periodic payment toward satisfaction of the unpaid arrearage 7or delinquency. That periodic payment shall be in addition to 8any periodic payment previously required for satisfaction of 9the arrearage or delinquency. The total periodic amount to be 10paid toward satisfaction of the arrearage or delinquency may 11be enforced and collected by any method provided by law for 12enforcement and collection of child support, including but not 13limited to income withholding under the Income Withholding for 14Support Act. Each order for support entered or modified on or 15after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 1693-1061) must contain a statement notifying the parties of the 17requirements of this subsection. Failure to include the 18statement in the order for support does not affect the 19validity of the order or the operation of the provisions of 20this subsection with regard to the order. This subsection 21shall not be construed to prevent or affect the establishment 22or modification of an order for support of a minor child or the 23establishment or modification of an order for support of a 24non-minor child or educational expenses under Section 513 of 25this Act. 26    (h) An order entered under this Section shall include a   HB2542- 33 -LRB104 09884 JRC 19953 b1provision requiring either parent to report to the other 2parent and to the Clerk of Court within 10 days each time 3either parent obtains new employment, and each time either 4parent's employment is terminated for any reason. The report 5shall be in writing and shall, in the case of new employment, 6include the name and address of the new employer. Failure to 7report new employment or the termination of current 8employment, if coupled with nonpayment of support for a period 9in excess of 60 days, is indirect criminal contempt. For 10either parent arrested for failure to report new employment 11bond shall be set in the amount of the child support that 12should have been paid during the period of unreported 13employment. An order entered under this Section shall also 14include a provision requiring either obligor and obligee to 15advise the other of a change in residence within 5 days of the 16change except when the court finds that the physical, mental, 17or emotional health of a party or that of a child, or both, 18would be seriously endangered by disclosure of the party's 19address.20    (i) The court does not lose the powers of contempt, 21driver's license suspension, or other child support 22enforcement mechanisms, including, but not limited to, 23criminal prosecution as set forth in this Act, upon the 24emancipation of the minor child.25(Source: P.A. 102-823, eff. 5-13-22; 103-967, eff. 1-1-25.)